Florida, session 2026, HB897.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 413.014, Florida Statutes, is amended
to read:
Page 1 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb897-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 897 2026
413.014 Community rehabilitation programs.—
(1) The Division of Blind Services shall enter into
cooperative agreements with community rehabilitation programs as
defined by the Rehabilitation Act of 1973, as amended, to be the
service providers for the blind citizens of their communities.
(2) The division shall, as rapidly as feasible, increase
the amount of such services provided by community rehabilitation
programs under subsection (3). The goal shall be to decrease the
amount of such services provided by division employees and to
increase to the maximum extent allowed by federal law the amount
of such services provided through cooperative agreements with
community service providers. The division shall seek, to the
maximum extent allowed by federal and state law and regulation,
all available federal funds for such purposes. Funds and in-kind
matching contributions from community and private sources shall
be used to maximize federal funds. Unless prohibited by federal
law or regulation, the share of the federal vocational
rehabilitation grant apportioned for services to the blind may
not be less than 17 percent.
(3) A community rehabilitation program must meet all of
the following requirements to enter into a cooperative agreement
with the division to provide services to persons who are blind
or visually impaired:
(a) Be a qualified nonprofit agency for the blind as
defined in s. 413.033(3) and be organized and operated
Page 2 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb897-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 897 2026
exclusively for charitable purposes under s. 501(c)(3) of the
Internal Revenue Code or be an approved program at a state
college or university.
(b) Maintain current accreditation from at least one of
the following national accrediting organizations:
1. The Commission on Accreditation of Rehabilitation
Facilities.
2. The Association for Education and Rehabilitation of the
Blind and Visually Impaired.
3. Any other nationally recognized accrediting body for
vision rehabilitation services as determined by the director of
the division.
(c) Employ staff who hold current, valid certification
from at least one of the following:
1. The Academy for Certification of Vision Rehabilitation
and Education Professionals.
2. The National Blindness Professional Certification
Board.
3. Any other nationally recognized certifying body for
vision rehabilitation professionals as determined by the
director of the division.
(d) Provide services required under the cooperative
agreement by the division, including, but not limited to, the
following:
1. Activities of daily living.
Page 3 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb897-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 897 2026
2. Assessments.
3. Assistive technology training.
4. Guidance and career counseling.
5. Communication skills training.
6. Community integration.
7. Counseling.
8. Low vision training.
9. Orientation and mobility training.
10. Preemployment transition services, including, but not
limited to, career coaching, development, and placement;
workplace readiness; personal assistance; vocational
rehabilitation; technology training; and transportation
services.
11. Recreation and leisure activities training.
12. Self-advocacy training.
13. Sensory and cognitive development.
14. Other services as determined by the director of the
division as may be required by state and federal guidelines.

The director of the division may temporarily waive staff
requirements and community rehabilitation program requirements
under this subsection for approval of new community
rehabilitation program organizations.
(4)(a) A community rehabilitation program that meets the
100 requirements in subsection (3) is a priority service provider
Page 4 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb897-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 897 2026
101 for purposes of program funding. In addition to the requirements
102 in subsection (3), the community rehabilitation program shall be
103 qualified, accredited, and certified with evidence-supported
104 outcomes aligned with the federal Rehabilitation Services
105 Administration performance indicators for services to persons
106 who are blind or visually impaired to ensure quality, safety,
107 accountability, and sustainability.
108 (b) In the event a community rehabilitation program is
109 unable to provide services to a specific client for reasons
110 including client choice, suspension of services, capacity, or
111 timeliness, the division may enter into a cooperative agreement
112 for services with a noncommunity rehabilitation program private
113 vendor. The noncommunity rehabilitation program private vendor
114 must meet the requirements in subsection (3) and comply with all
115 requirements provided in the community rehabilitation program
116 cooperative agreement to ensure quality, safety, accountability,
117 and sustainability. If the division enters into a cooperative
118 agreement with a noncommunity rehabilitation program private
119 vendor to provide services, the community rehabilitation program
120 serving that same geographic area must be notified by the
121 division of the name of the private vendor to ensure that the
122 client receives the same level of high-quality service offered
123 by the community rehabilitation program.
124 (5) The Florida Association of Agencies Serving the Blind,
125 Inc., shall coordinate with the division to ensure cooperative
Page 5 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb897-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 897 2026
126 agreements for services meet the needs of blind and visually
127 impaired clients served by community rehabilitation program
128 member organizations and act on behalf of such clients on
129 cooperative agreement issues or other issues in the best
130 interest of serving the clients.
131 (6) As authorized by and consistent with funding
132 appropriated in the General Appropriations Act, the Florida
133 Association of Agencies Serving the Blind, Inc., may submit
134 requests to the Legislature for funding for community
135 rehabilitation programs from the funds available as provided in
136 the General Appropriations Act. The division shall disperse
137 these funds to community rehabilitation programs that are
138 considered priority service providers under paragraph (4)(a)
139 within 45 days after receipt of a qualified invoice from a
140 community rehabilitation program with subsequent monthly
141 payments thereafter.
142 Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 6 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb897-00